Utah statutes.
20A-6-107.   Numbering of ballot propositions and bond propositions -- Duties of election officer and lieutenant governor.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (1)(b) and (1)(c), each ballot proposition shall be listed on the ballot under the heading "Proposition #___", with the number of the ballot proposition placed in the blank.

(b)  Each proposed amendment to the Utah Constitution shall be listed on the ballot under the heading "Constitutional Amendment ___", with a letter placed in the blank.

(c)  Each bond proposition that has qualified for the ballot shall be listed on the ballot under the title assigned to each bond proposition under Section 11-14-206.

(2) (a)  When an election officer or other person given authority to prepare or number ballot propositions receives a ballot proposition that is eligible for inclusion on the ballot, they shall ask the lieutenant governor to assign a number to the ballot proposition.

(b) (i)  Upon request from an election officer or other person given authority to prepare or number ballot propositions, the lieutenant governor shall assign each ballot proposition a unique number, except as provided under Subsection (2)(b)(iii).

(ii)  Ballot proposition numbers shall be assigned sequentially, in the order requests for ballot proposition numbers are received.

(iii)  The same ballot proposition number may be assigned to multiple ballot propositions if:

(A)  the sponsors of each ballot proposition agree, in writing, to share the number; and

(B)  the ballot propositions sharing the same number are identical in their terms, purpose, and effect, with jurisdiction being the only significant difference between the ballot propositions.

